Wyoming statutes. Title 19 Defense Forces and Affairs
Article 1. Military Service Relief Act
§ 19-11-114.
Employee pension benefit plans.

Every private employer in this state who maintains a defined benefit plan as defined by 29 U.S.C. 1002(35) shall credit the employee with his period of service in the uniformed services towards retirement eligibility and vesting under the plan, including the computation of any retirement benefits due under the express terms of the plan, when the accrued benefits due under the plan are derived from employer contributions to the plan. If the defined benefit plan provides benefits derived from employer and employee contributions to the plan, the employee shall be credited with his period of service in the uniformed services towards retirement eligibility and vesting under the plan, including the computation of any retirement benefits due under the express terms of the plan, provided that the employer contributions and the mandatory contributions of the employee are made to the plan.

If any private employer maintains an individual account plan or a defined contribution plan, as defined by 29 U.S.C. 1002(34), the employee shall be credited with his period of service in the uniformed services towards retirement eligibility under the express terms of the plan upon payment of the designated contributions to the plan and if such credit is permitted by the Internal Revenue Code.

An employee may be required to pay the employee cost, if any, of any funded benefit continued pursuant to this section to the extent other employees on furlough or leave of absence are so required.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 1.

§ 19-11-115.
State retirement systems; payment of contributions; interest.

Any employee who did not elect to make employee contributions pursuant to W.S.

19-11-113

to the state retirement system applicable to his employment during his period of service in the uniformed services shall be entitled to receive credit for his service in the uniformed services toward establishing retirement eligibility and for computation of benefits upon payment into the system in an amount equal to the employee contributions that would have been paid had the employee continued in employment and not been called to service in the uniformed services, together with interest thereon at the valuation interest rate of the system or plan in effect at the time payment is made. The contributions shall be based on the salary including any increases in compensation that the employee would have received had he remained in employment during the period of service in the uniformed services.

Upon payment by the employee of the employee contributions and interest as provided in subsection (a) of this section the employer shall pay to the retirement system an amount equal to the employer contributions that the employer would have paid to the retirement system had the employee remained in service, together with interest thereon, at the valuation interest rate in effect at the time payment is made. The contributions shall be based on the salary the employee would have received during the period of service in the uniformed services, including any increases in compensation that the employee would have received had he remained in employment during the period of service in the uniformed services. The employer contributions and interest due to the system shall be paid within thirty (30) days after the employee has paid all of the contributions due to the system or fund.

All employee contributions and interest due thereon made in payment for service in the uniformed services credit in accordance with subsection (a) of this section must be received by the system within five (5) years of his reemployment.

Should the employee fail to make the required contributions within four (4) years, the credit shall only count toward determining eligibility for retirement benefits. Any unpaid actuarial cost to the retirement system shall be borne by the employers through reflection in the employer rate established by the state retirement system’s actuarial committee.

Notwithstanding any other requirements in W.S.

19-11-113

or

19-11-114

or this section relating to payment of retirement contributions to a public or private retirement system, employer and employee contributions for any public or private retirement or pension system plan, not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) per person per year, may be paid by the Wyoming adjutant general, if the payment is permitted by the Internal Revenue Code, for any person whose primary occupation is that of a first responder and who is called or ordered into the federal service of the United States under title 10 of the United States Code.

The provisions of subsection (e) of this section shall also apply to any Wyoming resident whose primary occupation is that of a first responder when that person is called or ordered into federal service with a national guard unit in any state in the United States. The adjutant general shall promulgate rules and regulations for the administration of the payments authorized under subsection (e) of this section which rules shall provide a method for application for persons not serving in the Wyoming national guard and which shall establish a method for prorating payments where insufficient funds exist to make full payment on behalf of all qualifying persons.

The adjutant general shall report annually, no later than October 1, to the joint transportation, highways and military affairs interim committee. The report shall include the number of persons who qualified for the contributions under subsections (e) and (f) of this section, a listing of the civilian classifications of the persons applying for the contributions and the total amount expended for the contributions.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 1; 2007, ch. 23, § 1; 2009, ch. 109, § 1; 2013 ch. 130, § 1, effective March 13, 2013.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “five (5)” for “four (4)” in (c).

The 2009 amendment,

added (e) through (g).

Laws 2009, ch. 109, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 2, 2009.

The 2013 amendment,

substituted “for the administration of the payments authorized under subsection (e) of this section which rules shall” for “to” and added “and which shall establish a method for prorating payments where insufficient funds exist to make full payment on behalf of all qualifying persons” in the second sentence of (f).

Laws 2013, ch. 130, § 2, made the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2013.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2009, ch. 109, § 2, provides: “(a) There is appropriated eight hundred ninety-two thousand nine hundred fourteen dollars ($892,914.00) from the general fund to the Wyoming adjutant general. This appropriation shall be for the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2010. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shall revert on June 30, 2010. The program created by this act shall be included in the adjutant general's standard budget request. Of this appropriation:

“(i) Seven hundred eighty-nine thousand seven hundred fifty dollars ($789,750.00) shall only be expended for the purpose of funding employer and employee retirement contributions under W.S. 19 11 115(e) and (f) for persons who are called or ordered into federal service of the United States under title 10 of the United States Code;

“(ii) One hundred three thousand one hundred sixty-four dollars ($103,164.00) shall only be expended to fund the employee authorized under subsection (b) of this section and other administrative and start-up costs to implement the purposes of this act.

“(b) The adjutant general is authorized one (1) full-time equivalent position to implement the purposes of this act, including validating the qualifications of the retirement plans of eligible persons and establishing payment amounts under W.S. 19 11 115(e) and (f), as created by section 1 of this act.”

§ 19-11-116.
Payment of death and survivor benefits; state retirement.

The employee’s period of service in the uniformed services shall be counted as creditable service in the state retirement system in which he was a member for determining eligibility for death and survivor benefits and in the computation of benefits, provided that the following conditions are satisfied:

The beneficiary of the death or survivor benefits shall provide payment of the unpaid portion of the contributions of the deceased member. The beneficiary may agree in writing to have the payment of the unpaid portion of the contributions of the deceased member deducted from the benefits over a period not to exceed four (4) years. The beneficiary may pay, in the alternative, the actuarial cost of such additional credit in a lump sum prior to the distribution of benefits;

If there is more than one (1) beneficiary a written agreement to pay the unpaid contributions of the deceased member shall be unanimous. In the event that a recipient is a minor child the legal guardian of the minor child may express consent for the minor child;

The board of trustees of every state retirement system shall adopt a written policy covering all beneficiaries’ and survivors’ rights to pay the required contributions in order to have the employee’s military service computed in the computation of any death or survivor benefits payable under the state retirement system.

If all of the conditions of subsection (a) of this section are satisfied the employer shall pay the employer contributions in a manner consistent with this section.

If the beneficiary of the death or survivor benefits of the deceased member elects not to pay the employee contributions due the system on account for such service in the uniformed services credit, the computation of death and survivor benefits shall be based on the actual service of the member in the system prior to his call to service in the uniformed services. The death or survivor benefits provided for herein shall be due and payable upon the death of the member.

If the application of any provision set forth in this section results in an unpaid actuarial cost to the retirement system, it shall be borne by the employers through reflection in the employer rate established by the state retirement system’s actuarial committee.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 1.

§ 19-11-117.
Inapplicability to deferred retirement option plans; state retirement.

The provisions of this article are inapplicable with respect to employees who are participants in a deferred retirement option plan.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 1.

§ 19-11-118.
License validity; renewals, suspension of fees.

The payment of any reinstatement or licensing fee or the application for renewal of any license imposed by the state or any public or governmental entity which the person who performs service in the uniformed services validly holds at the time he enters service in the uniformed services shall be suspended until ninety (90) days after his release from service in the uniformed services or discharge from hospitalization incidental to his service in the uniformed services, provided that the person complies with all of the licensing requirements including the payment of fees before the expiration of ninety (90) days after his release from service in the uniformed services or discharge from hospitalization incidental to his service in the uniformed services. Any license covered by this section which that person validly held at the time he entered service in the uniformed services shall remain in force and effect until ninety (90) days after his release from service in the uniformed services, provided that the licensing requirements are complied with, including the payment of any licensing and renewal fees owed.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 1.

§ 19-11-119.
Professional and occupational licenses; renewal fees waived; educational requirements.

The person who performed service in the uniformed services shall be exempted from the payment of any reinstatement or licensing renewal fee required by any profession or occupation governed by title 33 of the Wyoming statutes or by other law or ordinance applicable to any such person who performed service in the uniformed services during his period of service in the uniformed services except those licensing or renewal fees owed for the year in which he is released from service in the uniformed services or discharged from hospitalization incidental to his service in the uniformed services. The person who performed service in the uniformed services shall have ninety (90) days after his release from service in the uniformed services or hospitalization incidental to his service in the uniformed services to pay the licensing or renewal fees then owed. The person who performed service in the uniformed services shall be exempted from compliance with any continuing educational requirements applicable to such license during his period of service in the uniformed services except those required for the year in which he is released from service in the uniformed services or discharged from hospitalization incidental to his service in the uniformed services. The person who performed service in the uniformed services shall complete such requirements within one hundred eighty (180) days from his release from service in the uniformed services or discharge from hospitalization incidental to his service in the uniformed services. Any applicable license shall continue in force and effect provided that both the renewal fees and the educational requirements are completed within the periods provided herein.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 1.

§ 19-11-120.
Academic penalties prohibited.

No student member of any uniformed service of the United States shall have his education, including but not limited to colleges and universities, vocational or technical or trade schools or secondary educational institutions, unnecessarily disrupted because of his service in the uniformed services. No undue penalties shall be assessed because of his service in the uniformed services. No student shall forfeit, and shall be entitled to reimbursement for, any fees or education expenses if such student is ordered into active state service for a period of more than thirty (30) consecutive days or active federal service pursuant to a presidential call or mobilization.

The enforcement of this section shall be reserved for the appropriate governing body having jurisdiction over the student and shall implement the intent expressed herein.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 1; 2003, ch. 19, § 1.

§ 19-11-121.
District courts; jurisdiction; venue; preference docket.

In the case of an action against the state, the district court in which the state or any of its political subdivisions exercises authority or conducts its business shall have jurisdiction to hear actions to enforce the provisions of this article. In the case of a private employer, the appropriate district court is the district court for any district in which the person in the uniformed services is employed.

The district courts of the state shall have jurisdiction upon the filing of a complaint, motion, petition or other appropriate pleading by or on behalf of the person claiming a right or benefit under this article to require the employer to:

Comply with the provisions of this article;

Compensate the person for any loss of wages or benefits suffered by reason of such employer’s failure to comply with the provisions of this article;

Pay the person an amount equal to the amount of lost wages or benefits as liquidated damages if the court determines that the employer’s failure to comply with the provisions of this article was willful.

Any compensation awarded under paragraphs (b)(i), (ii) and (iii) of this section shall be in addition to and shall not diminish any of the other rights and benefits provided for in this article.

All district and appellate courts shall give preference in scheduling such actions upon the motion of any person in the uniformed services, or his attorney, who presents certification that the person has performed service in the uniformed services or is in service in the uniformed services.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 1.

§ 19-11-122.
Servicemembers Civil Relief Act; application to national guard; penalty for violation of rights; enforcement; preferences.

Members of the Wyoming national guard ordered to active state service by the state or federal government for a period of more than thirty (30) consecutive days shall have all protections afforded to persons in the military service of the United States under the Servicemembers Civil Relief Act, Public Law 108-189. Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, nothing in this subsection shall be construed to authorize the imposition of any penalty under the Servicemembers Civil Relief Act for violation of the protections afforded to members of the Wyoming national guard pursuant to this subsection. As used in this subsection, “active state service” means as defined in W.S. 19-7-101(a)(v).

Any person who knowingly violates the protections provided to members of the Wyoming national guard pursuant to subsection (a) of this section or W.S.

19-11-125

shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000.00).

The protections afforded to members of the Wyoming national guard pursuant to subsection (a) of this section or W.S.

19-11-125

may serve as the basis for an action or as a defense. The courts of this state that would otherwise have jurisdiction over a case shall have jurisdiction over proceedings involving the Servicemembers Civil Relief Act, the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act and W.S.

19-11-125

, which shall be governed by the rules applicable to ordinary proceedings.

The courts shall give preference in scheduling proceedings pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, upon the motion of any person in the uniformed services, or the person’s attorney, who presents certification that the person has performed service in the uniformed services or is in service in the uniformed services.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 1; 2004, ch. 4, § 1; 2018 ch. 58, § 2, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2004 amendment

added present (a) and (b); rewrote former (a), which read “The district courts of this state shall have jurisdiction over proceedings involving the Soldiers’ and Sailors’ Civil Relief Act of 1940, as amended, and the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act, which shall be governed by the rules applicable to ordinary proceedings” as present (c); redesignated former (b) as present (d), deleting “district and appellate” preceding “courts.”

Laws 2004, ch. 4, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 1, 2004.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (b), inserted “or W.S.

19-11-125

” following “(a) of this section”; in (c), inserted “or W.S.

19-11-125

” following “(a) of this section” and “and W.S. 19-11-125” following “Reemployment Rights Act”; in (d), substituted “scheduling proceedings pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, upon” for “scheduling such proceedings, upon”; and made stylistic changes.

Federal law. —

The Servicemembers Civil Relief Act is codified as 50 USCS Appx § 501 et seq. The Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act is codified as 38 USCS § 4301 et seq.

§ 19-11-123.
Award of attorney fees.

In any proceeding employed to enforce any of the provisions of this act, the court shall award reasonable litigation expenses including reasonable attorney’s fees.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 19-11-103(a)(xii).

§ 19-11-124.
Vacancies in elected office.

No vacancy in the office of an elected official shall be deemed to have occurred by reason of his absence when the official is called to service in the uniformed services. No change in the residence of an elected official is deemed to have occurred by reason of his service in the uniformed services.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 1.

§ 19-11-125.
Termination, suspension or reinstatement of contract services.

A person ordered to active service in the uniformed services, or a person already in active service in the uniformed services and transferred, for a period of more than thirty (30) but not more than one hundred eighty (180) consecutive days may suspend, or for more than one hundred eighty (180) days may terminate or suspend, a service contract described in subsection (b) of this section at any time after the date the person receives military orders, provided the person complies with the notice requirements in subsection (c) of this section.

Service contracts subject to subsection (a) of this section include contracts issued or renewed on or after July 1, 2018, subject to Wyoming law, which provide any of the following:

Telecommunication services;

Internet services;

Television services including cable television, satellite and other television like services;

Athletic club or gym memberships;

Satellite radio or communication services;

Other services provided pursuant to a contract that requires periodic and ongoing payments.

To terminate or suspend a service contract pursuant to this section a uniformed services member or spouse of a uniformed services member shall deliver to the holder of the service contract a written or electronic notice of the suspension or termination and a copy of the member’s military orders. Termination or suspension is effective on the date specified in the notice, or ten (10) days after the date the notice was sent, whichever is later. Suspension shall continue until the member or spouse of a uniformed services member reinstates service by delivering to the holder of the service contract a written or electronic notice of reinstatement. The contract holder shall resume providing services effective not more than ten (10) business days after the date specified in the notice, or ten (10) days after the date the notice was sent, whichever is later. A service member who terminates, suspends or reinstates services may not be charged any penalty, interest, fee, loss of deposit or other cost because of the termination, suspension or reinstatement. A service contract described in this subsection may be contracted together with or separately by the spouse of the person ordered to service in the uniformed services, provided that at the time under contract the spouse resides with the person.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit a holder of a service contract from requiring the return of tangible property before suspending or terminating the contractual obligations of a person in subsection (a) of this section.

Any person who knowingly violates the protections provided to a person in subsection (a) of this section, or any person in subsection (a) of this section who obtains protections under this section through fraudulent means, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000.00).

History.

2018 ch. 58, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

Effective date. —

Laws 2018, ch. 58, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2018.